Utah statutes.
63K-5-301.   Emergency responder entering Utah to respond to an emergency.

An emergency responder who enters into Utah in response to a request for assistance by an official or emergency responder of Utah or pursuant to an agreement providing for interstate mutual aid is considered to be responding to an emergency.

